District of Columbia statutes.
29-304.22

Liability of shareholders.

(a)

A purchaser from a corporation of its own shares shall not be liable to the corporation or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were authorized to be issued or specified in the subscription agreement.

(b)

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a shareholder shall not be personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation, except that the shareholder may become personally liable by reason of the shareholder’s own acts or conduct.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720